California statutes. Insurance Code
(b) Except in the case in which an applicant has already paid a fee on a pending application for admission, the commissioner shall collect a one-hundred-thirty-six-dollar ($136) fee for filing each application for name approval and reservation. An application for name approval may contain not more than three names in the order of applicant’s preference and the commissioner’s approval shall be limited to only one name submitted by any one application.

(c) The certificate of approval shall be attached to the articles of incorporation before the Secretary of State shall file the articles or any amended articles. The commissioner may reject any name submitted when it is an interference with, or too similar to one already appropriated, or when it is likely to mislead the public in any respect. In the event of a rejection, the applicant shall legally change its name to one approved by the commissioner or, if a foreign or alien insurer, may arrange to conduct any business it may do with the public in California under an approved name as an operating name, identifying itself under both its true name and operating name in the conduct of all official business with the commissioner.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 1282, this section shall apply to reciprocal insurers, including their attorneys in fact, and shall apply to motor clubs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 12.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

881.1.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 881 or any other provision of law, neither the commissioner or the Secretary of State shall reject a name proposed by an entity seeking admission as a home protection company if such name was used by such entity for conduct of a home protection or home warranty business in this state for at least one year prior to May 3, 1978. Every such name, upon the commissioner’s determination of such use, shall be approved upon submission of application therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1203.)
-------------------------------------------

881.2.

Notwithstanding Section 5652 of the Financial Code, use of the term “savings bank” in a name or title may be approved for use by the commissioner if the remaining words in the name or title show that the insurer is engaged in the business of insurance and is not a savings bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 740, Sec. 3.8.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

881.3.

Upon approval of an applicant’s name by the commissioner, and the issuance of a certificate approving the same, the applicant may apply to the Secretary of State for the issuance of a certificate of reservation of corporate name for the same periods specified in Section 881.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 737.)
-------------------------------------------

881.5.

If through inadvertance or otherwise a corporation does not comply with Section 881 of the Insurance Code, or with Sections 201.5, 202, 2105, 2106, 2106.5, and 2107 of the Corporations Code when any of such sections is applicable, any corporation lawfully engaged in the insurance business in this state may bring an action for judicial relief against such corporation by means of any remedy afforded by law. Such action may be based upon any of the grounds by reason of which the commissioner could or would have denied application for approval of the corporate name of the noncomplying corporation. In such an action the court may order such corporate defendant to adopt a new name or an operating name, when permissible, acceptable to both the Secretary of State and the commissioner, by filing a certificate of amendment or by filing an amended statement and designation with the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 737.)
-------------------------------------------

882.

When two or more insurers propose to issue an underwriter’s policy, each insurer shall first file an application with the commissioner for approval and registration of the name or title under which the policy is to be issued. The commissioner may reject any name submitted when it is an interference with, or too similar to, one already appropriated or when it is likely to mislead the public in any respect. In that case the application may be amended to submit another or other names.

The commissioner shall charge and collect in advance a fee of seventy-two dollars ($72) from each insurer filing an application for approval and registration of that name or title, or for filing any amendment thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 13.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

882.5.

(a) A home protection company proposing to issue a contract bearing the name of itself as well as another name which is the name of a person, persons, or organization of persons licensed pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code, or a franchised name therefor, shall first file an application with the commissioner for approval of the other name. The commissioner may reject any name so submitted when it is an interference with, or too similar to, one already appropriated or when it is likely to mislead the public in any respect. However, the name shall not be rejected, except pursuant to subdivision (b), if the name was used by the same entity for a similar offering in this state prior to May 3, 1978. In case of any rejection of a name pursuant to this subdivision, the application may be amended to submit another or other names.

(b) No such name shall be approved unless all power to transact home protection business (except as authorized in Section 771.1) and other powers specified by the commissioner by regulation, are specifically retained by the home protection company and the home protection contracts prominently disclose that fact.

The commissioner, pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, may adopt reasonable regulations to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

883.

An underwriter’s policy may be issued under a name thus registered and shall clearly show:

(a) The names of the insurers guaranteeing it.

(b) The severalty of the contract.

(c) The proportion of the premium to be paid to each insurer.

(d) The proportion of liability which each assumes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

884.

Unless renewed, the approval and registration of all underwriters’ names shall expire at 12:01 a.m. July 1 of each even-numbered year. Renewal may be secured by filing with the commissioner an application therefor, together with a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25). An application shall be filed during the month of May preceding that July 1. The commissioner shall furnish the application forms for the renewal. The commissioner shall, upon receipt of a proper renewal application and payment of the filing fee therefor, renew the approval and registration of the underwriter’s name unless he or she finds any of the following:

(a) The insurer has abandoned use of the underwriter’s name.

(b) The insurer is actually using or publicizing the name in any manner after it has discontinued the issuance of underwriter’s policies bearing that name.

(c) The insurer has used that underwriter’s name in a manner that has resulted in misrepresentation or fraud.

(d) The insurer has used that underwriter’s name in a manner that would violate any provision of law relating to the conduct of its business.

(e) The insurer has secured that underwriter’s name through misrepresentation or concealment of material information.

(f) Reasons exist that would warrant refusal of approval or registration if the same were being initially requested.

If the commissioner so finds he or she shall advise all insurers
 using that underwriter’s name in writing that the renewal application is denied and set forth with particularity the reasons for the denial. That denial shall be effective 30 days after mailing of that advice to the insurer unless within those 30 days the insurer requests a hearing. In this event the advice of denial shall constitute the commissioner’s opening pleading for the purpose of the hearing, which shall be deemed denied by the insurer. The insurer if it elects may, within 10 days, file an additional written response. The hearing shall be noticed and commenced within a reasonable time. During those 30 days, and, if a request for hearing is filed, until the termination of that proceeding, the insurer may continue the use of the underwriter’s name and the issuance of policies thereunder provided timely renewal application has been filed and the filing fee paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 14.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

885.

The commissioner may at any time institute proceedings for the revocation of approval and registration of an underwriter’s name upon any of the grounds set forth in Section 884 by following the procedure prescribed in that section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1494.)
-------------------------------------------

886.

Termination of approval and registration of an underwriter’s name, whether through denial of a renewal application or revocation, shall have no effect on the validity or the retention in force to normal expiration of any underwriter’s policies issued on or prior to the date of such termination with an effective date not more than sixty (60) days after its issue date provided that if any such policy is continuous in form it shall not be continued in force beyond its annual renewal date first occurring after such date of termination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1494.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Financial Statements of Insurers [900. - 925.4.]

900.

(a) On or before the first day of March of each year every insurer doing business in this state shall make and file with the commissioner, in the number, form, and by the methods prescribed by the commissioner, statements exhibiting its condition and affairs as of the previous December 31. If the first day of March falls on a day other than a business day, the filing is due to the commissioner by the first business day preceding the first day of March.

(b) Each year, on or before the following dates, every insurer doing business in this state shall make and file with the commissioner, in the number, form, and methods prescribed by the commissioner, statements exhibiting its condition and affairs for the period beginning on January 1 of the current calendar year through the end of each quarter of the current year as described below. These quarterly filings shall cover the period of time beginning January 1 of the current year through and including the last day of the quarter for which the report is being made. The first quarter filing shall be filed with the commissioner on or before May 15th of every year. The second quarter filing shall be filed with the commissioner on or before August 15th of every year. The third quarter filing shall be filed with the commissioner on or before November 15th of every year. If any of these dates fall on a day other than a business day, then the filing is due to the commissioner by the first business day preceding that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 599, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

900.2.

(a) All insurers doing business in this state shall have an annual audit by an independent certified public accountant. The audit, including required auditor and management reporting, the audit committee and its membership, and other aspects of the audit content and process, shall be conducted, and the audit report prepared and filed, in conformity with the standards adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

(b) The commissioner may grant 30-day extensions of the filing date upon a showing by the insurer and its independent certified public accountant of the reasons for requesting each extension and the determination by the commissioner of substantial cause for an extension. The request for an extension shall be submitted in writing not less than 10 days prior to the due date in sufficient detail to permit the commissioner to make an informed decision on the requested extension.

(c) The commissioner may promulgate regulations to further the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 234, Sec. 5.   (AB 299)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

900.3.

(a) An insurer or group of insurers doing business in this state shall establish an internal audit function to provide independent, objective, and reasonable assurance to the insurer’s audit committee and management regarding the insurer’s governance, risk management, and internal controls. This assurance shall be provided by performing general and specific audits, reviews, and tests, and by employing other techniques deemed necessary to protect assets, evaluate control effectiveness and efficiency, and evaluate compliance with policies and regulations.

(b) The audit committee of an insurer or group of insurers shall be responsible for overseeing the insurer’s
 internal audit function and granting the person or persons performing the internal audit function suitable authority and resources to fulfill the responsibilities required by this section.

(c) To ensure that an internal auditor remains objective, the internal audit function shall be organizationally independent. Organizational independence does not preclude dual-reporting relationships. The internal audit function shall not defer ultimate judgment on audit matters to others.

(d) (1) An individual shall be appointed to head the internal audit function, and shall have direct and unrestricted access to the insurer’s board of
 directors or audit committee.

(2) The head of the internal audit function shall report to the insurer’s audit committee regularly, but not less than annually, regarding all of the following:

(A) The periodic audit plan.

(B) Factors that may adversely impact the internal audit function’s independence or effectiveness.

(C) Material findings from completed audits.

(D) The appropriateness of corrective actions implemented by management as a result of audit findings.

(e) If an insurer is a member of an
 insurance holding company system or a group of insurers, the insurer may comply with this section at the ultimate controlling parent level, an intermediate holding company level, or the individual legal entity level.

(f) This section shall not apply to an insurer if either of the following apply:

(1) The insurer has annual direct written and unaffiliated assumed premium of less than five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000), including international direct and assumed premium, but excluding premiums reinsured with the Federal Crop Insurance Corporation and National Flood Insurance Program.

(2) The insurer is a member of a group of insurers, and the group of insurers has annual direct written and unaffiliated assumed
 premium of less than one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000), including international direct and assumed premium, but excluding premiums reinsured with the Federal Crop Insurance Corporation and National Flood Insurance Program.

(g) For purposes of this section, “internal audit function” means a person or persons that provide independent, objective, and reasonable assurance designed to add value, improve an organization’s operations, and accomplish an organization’s objectives by bringing a systematic, disciplined approach to evaluate and improve the effectiveness of risk management, control, and governance processes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 201, Sec. 3.   (AB 1813)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

900.5.

The commissioner shall charge and collect four hundred twenty dollars ($420) in advance as a fee for the first filing each year of a statement under this article. Only one fee shall be charged or collected from any one insurer in any one calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 15.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

900.8.

The commissioner may decline to grant or renew or may suspend or revoke a certificate of authority of an insurer that knowingly files with the department a false financial statement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 395.)
-------------------------------------------

900.9.

Any officer, director, employee or agent of any insurer, who wilfully signs or files a false or untrue report or statement of the business, affairs, or condition of such insurer with intent to deceive any public officer, office, or board to which such insurer is required by law to report, or which has authority by law to examine into its affairs or transactions, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 395.)
-------------------------------------------

902.

Insurers engaged in the business of compensation insurance shall, at such intervals as may be prescribed by the commissioner, file statements supplemental to such annual statements and covering such matters dealt with in such annual statements as the commissioner designates. Neither such supplemental report nor any synopsis thereof need be published.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

903.

The commissioner shall require statements and reports to be verified as follows: (a) If made by a domestic corporation, by the oaths of any two of the executive officers thereof. (b) If made by an individual or firm, by the oath of such individual or a member of the firm. (c) If made by a foreign insurer, by the oath of the principal executive officer thereof, or manager, residing within the United States.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

903.5.

In any case where an insurer is required by law to file with the commissioner statements or reports respecting its financial condition, income or disbursements, verified or signed by its designated officers, agents, or employees, the commissioner may accept and file the statement or report verified by affidavit of the president or vice president and the treasurer or secretary of such insurer, in lieu of the verification or signature otherwise prescribed by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

904.

In addition to the annual statement required to be filed pursuant to Section 900, each admitted insurer shall file an authorization for disclosure to the commissioner of financial records pertaining to such funds pursuant to Section 7473 of the Government Code, to be effective until the next such annual filing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1320.)
-------------------------------------------

922.

The guarantee by the Small Business Administrator that a surety shall not suffer loss as set forth in the Small Business Investment Act of 1958, as amended, shall for all purposes and requirements under this code be deemed a contract of reinsurance between such surety and an authorized or admitted reinsurer irrespective of whether or not such guarantee contains all the provisions required of other reinsurance contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 383.)
-------------------------------------------

922.1.

The Legislature declares its intent that:

(a) In some instances, it is appropriate for the protection of insureds, insurers, and the public generally, that assuming insurers be required to provide security for the payment of their reinsurance obligations.

(b) Where such security is provided and upon the insolvency of the assuming insurer or initiation of receivership proceedings against it, the commissioner shall have the authority to determine whether it is in the best interest of insureds, claimants, and insurers to retain such security in the United States, to allow the filing of claims against the assuming insurer in the United States, and to have such claims valued in a United States proceeding subject to United States laws.

(c) In furtherance of the protection of insureds, insurers, and the public generally, the Legislature hereby states that these matters are fundamental to the business of insurance and hereby exercises its powers and privileges available pursuant to Sections 1011 and 1012 of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 840, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

922.2.

(a) Credit for reinsurance shall be allowed a domestic ceding insurer as either an asset or a deduction from liability in accordance with Sections 922.4 and 922.5 only if the reinsurance contract contains provisions that provide, in substance, as follows:

(1) The reinsurer shall indemnify the ceding insurer for the risk it has assumed according to the terms and conditions contained in the reinsurance contract.

(2) In the event of insolvency, or a change in the status of the ceding company as defined in this section, and the appointment of a conservator, liquidator, or statutory successor of
 the ceding company, the reinsurance shall be payable to the conservator,
 liquidator, or statutory successor on the basis of claims allowed against the insolvent company by any court of competent jurisdiction or by any conservator, liquidator, or statutory successor of the company having authority to allow those claims, without diminution because of that insolvency or change in status, or because the conservator, liquidator, or statutory successor has failed to pay all or a portion of any claims. Payments by the reinsurer as set forth in this subdivision shall be made directly to the ceding insurer or to its conservator, liquidator, or statutory successor, except where the contract of insurance or reinsurance specifically provides another payee of such reinsurance in the event of the insolvency or change in status of the ceding insurer.

The reinsurance contract may provide that the conservator, liquidator, or statutory
 successor of a ceding insurer shall give written notice of the pendency of a claim against the ceding insurer indicating the policy or bond reinsured, within a reasonable time after such claim is filed and the reinsurer may interpose, at its own expense, in the proceeding in which the claim is to be adjudicated, any defense or defenses which it may deem available to the ceding insurer or its conservator, liquidator, or statutory successor. The expense thus incurred by the reinsurer shall be payable subject to court approval out of the estate of the insolvent ceding insurer as part of the expense of conservation or liquidation to the extent of a proportionate share of the benefit which may accrue to the ceding insurer in conservation or liquidation, solely as a result of the defense undertaken by the reinsurer.

(b) Payment pursuant to a
 reinsurance contract shall be made within a reasonable time with reasonable provision for verification in accordance with the terms of the reinsurance agreement. However, in no event shall the payments be beyond the period required by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners (NAIC) Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual.

(c) The original insured or policyholder shall not have any rights against the reinsurer which are not specifically set forth in the contract of reinsurance, or in a specific agreement between the reinsurer and the original insured or policyholder.

(d) For purposes of this section, the phrase “change in the status of the ceding company” means a finding by the commissioner that conditions set forth in subdivision (d) or (i) of Section 1011, a Regulatory
 Action Level Event as defined in Section 739.4, or any other event which permits the appointment of a conservator, liquidator, or statutory successor has occurred with respect to the ceding company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   (SB 1216)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

922.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, credit for reinsurance, as either an asset or a deduction, shall not be allowed in any accounting or financial statement of the ceding insurer in respect to any so-called reinsurance contract unless, in such contract, the reinsurer undertakes to indemnify the ceding insurer, not only in form but in fact, against all or a part of the loss or liability arising out of the original insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 840, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

922.31.

(a) A ceding insurer shall take steps to manage its reinsurance recoverables proportionate to its own book of business. A domestic ceding insurer shall notify the commissioner within 30 days after reinsurance recoverables from any single assuming insurer, or group of affiliated assuming insurers, exceeds 50 percent of the domestic ceding insurer’s last reported surplus to policyholders, or after it is determined that reinsurance recoverables from any single assuming insurer, or group of affiliated assuming insurers, is likely to exceed this limit. The notification shall demonstrate that the exposure is safely managed by the domestic ceding insurer.

(b) A ceding
 insurer shall take steps to diversify its reinsurance program. A domestic ceding insurer shall notify the commissioner within 30 days after ceding to any single assuming insurer, or group of affiliated assuming insurers, more than 20 percent of the ceding insurer’s gross written premium in the prior calendar year, or after it has determined that the reinsurance ceded to any single assuming insurer, or group of affiliated assuming insurers, is likely to exceed this limit. The notification shall demonstrate that the exposure is safely managed by the domestic ceding insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   (SB 1216)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

922.4.

Credit for reinsurance shall be allowed a domestic ceding insurer as either an asset or a deduction from liability on account of reinsurance ceded only when the reinsurer meets the requirements of subdivision (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f). Credit shall be allowed under subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (e) only for cessions of those kinds or classes of business that the assuming insurer is licensed or otherwise permitted to write or assume in its state of domicile or, in the case of a United States branch of an alien assuming insurer, in the state through which it is entered and licensed to transact insurance or reinsurance. The commissioner may adopt by regulation specific additional requirements relating to or setting forth the valuation of assets or reserve credits, the amount and forms of security supporting reinsurance arrangements described in
 subdivision (b) of Section 922.85, and the circumstances pursuant to which credit will be reduced or eliminated.

(a) Credit shall be allowed when the reinsurance is ceded to an assuming insurer that is licensed to transact insurance or reinsurance in this state unless the assuming insurer is the subject of a regulatory order or regulatory oversight by any state in which it is licensed based upon a commissioner’s determination that the assuming insurer is in a hazardous financial condition.

(b) (1) Credit shall be allowed when the reinsurance is ceded to an assuming insurer that is accredited as a reinsurer in this state unless the assuming insurer is the subject of a regulatory order or regulatory oversight by any state in which it is licensed based upon a commissioner’s determination that the assuming insurer is in a hazardous financial condition. An
 accredited reinsurer is one that does all of the following:

(A) Files with the commissioner evidence of its submission to this state’s jurisdiction.

(B) Submits to this state’s authority to examine its books and records.

(C) Designates the commissioner or a designated attorney in this state as its true and lawful attorney upon whom may be served any lawful process in any action, suit, or proceeding instituted by or on behalf of the ceding insurer.

(D) Is licensed to transact insurance or reinsurance in at least one state, or in the case of a United States branch of an alien assuming insurer, is entered through and licensed to transact insurance or reinsurance in at least one state.

(E) Files annually with the commissioner a copy of its annual statement filed with the insurance department of its state of domicile and a copy of its most recent audited financial statement and other financial information requested by the commissioner.

(F) Submits a statement, signed and verified by an officer of the assuming insurer to be true and correct, that discloses whether the assuming insurer or any affiliated person who owns or has a controlling interest in the assuming insurer is currently known to be the subject of any of the following:

(i) Any order or proceeding regarding conservation, liquidation, or receivership.

(ii) Any order or proceeding regarding the revocation or suspension of a license or accreditation to transact insurance or reinsurance in any jurisdiction.

(iii) Any order or proceeding brought by an insurance regulator in any jurisdiction seeking to restrict or stop the assuming insurer from transacting insurance or reinsurance based upon a hazardous financial condition.

The assuming insurer shall provide the commissioner with copies of any orders or other documents initiating proceedings subject to disclosure under this paragraph. The statement shall affirm that no actions, proceedings, or orders subject to this subparagraph are outstanding against the assuming insurer or any affiliated person who owns or has a controlling interest in the assuming insurer, except as disclosed in the statement.

(G) Demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commissioner that it has adequate financial capacity to meet its reinsurance obligations and is otherwise qualified to assume reinsurance from domestic
 insurers. An assuming insurer is deemed to meet this requirement if it maintains a surplus as regards policyholders in an amount that is not less than twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) and whose accreditation has not been denied by the commissioner within 90 days of its submission. An assuming insurer who is not deemed to meet this requirement shall obtain the affirmative approval of the commissioner. The approval of the commissioner shall be based upon a finding that the assuming insurer has adequate financial capacity to meet its reinsurance obligations and is otherwise qualified to assume reinsurance from domestic insurers.

(2) The commissioner may deny or revoke an assuming insurer’s accreditation if the assuming insurer does not meet all of the standards required of an accredited reinsurer, or if its accreditation would be hazardous to the policyholders of this state. In determining whether to deny or revoke accreditation, the
 commissioner may consider the qualifications of the assuming insurer with respect to all the following subjects:

(A) Its financial stability.

(B) The lawfulness and quality of its investments.

(C) The competency, character, and integrity of its management.

(D) The competency, character, and integrity of persons who own or have a controlling interest in the assuming insurer.

(E) Whether claims under its contracts are promptly and fairly adjusted and are promptly and fully paid in accordance with the law and the terms of the contracts.

(3) Credit shall not be allowed a domestic ceding insurer if the assuming insurer’s
 accreditation has been revoked by the commissioner after notice and hearing.

(c) Credit shall be allowed when the reinsurance is ceded to an assuming insurer that has been certified by the commissioner pursuant to Section 922.41.

(d) (1) Credit shall be allowed when the reinsurance is ceded to an assuming insurer that maintains a trust fund in a qualified United States financial institution as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 922.7 for the payment of the valid claims of its United States ceding insurers, their assigns, and successors in interest. To enable the commissioner to determine the sufficiency of the trust fund the assuming insurer shall report annually to the commissioner information substantially the same as that required to be reported on the NAIC Annual Statement form by licensed insurers or any other form required by the NAIC.

(2) Credit for reinsurance shall not be granted under this subdivision unless the form of the trust and any amendments to the trust have been approved by either:

(A) The commissioner of the state where the trust is domiciled.

(B) The commissioner of another state who, pursuant to the terms of the trust instrument, has accepted principal regulatory oversight of the trust.

The trust and any trust amendments shall also be filed with the commissioner of every state in which the ceding insurer beneficiaries of the trust are domiciled. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing in this paragraph shall prevent the commissioner from disapproving the form of the trust if it is not in compliance with this state’s laws and regulations.

(3) Credit for reinsurance shall not be granted under this subdivision unless the following requirements are met:

(A) The trust instrument shall provide that contested claims shall be valid, enforceable, and payable out of funds in trust to the extent remaining unsatisfied 30 days after entry of the final order of any court of competent jurisdiction in the United States.

(B) The trust shall vest legal title to its assets in the trustees of the trust for the benefit of the grantor’s United States ceding insurers, their assigns, and successors in interest.

(C) The trust and the assuming insurer shall be subject to examination as determined by the commissioner.

(D) The trust shall remain in effect
 for as long as the assuming insurer, or any member or former member of a group of insurers, shall have outstanding obligations due under the reinsurance agreements subject to the trust.

(E) No later than February 28 of each year, the trustees of the trust shall report to the commissioner in writing setting forth the balance of the trust and listing the trust’s investments at the preceding yearend and shall certify the date of termination of the trust, if so planned, or certify that the trust shall not expire within the next 18 months.

(F) The assuming insurer shall do both of the following:

(i) Submit to the jurisdiction of any court of competent jurisdiction in any state of the United States, comply with all requirements necessary to give the court jurisdiction, and abide by the final decision of the court or of any
 appellate court in the event of an appeal.

(ii) Designate the commissioner or an attorney in this state as its true and lawful agent upon whom may be served any lawful process in any action, suit, or proceeding instituted by or on behalf of the ceding insurer.

This subparagraph is not intended to conflict with or override the obligation of the parties to a reinsurance agreement to arbitrate their disputes, if this obligation is created in the agreement.

(G) The assuming insurer shall agree in the trust agreement that notwithstanding any other provision in the trust instrument, if the trust fund is inadequate because it contains an amount less than the amount required by paragraph (4), or if the grantor of the trust has been declared insolvent or placed into receivership, rehabilitation, liquidation, or similar proceedings under the laws
 of its state or country of domicile:

(i) The trustee shall comply with an order of the commissioner with regulatory oversight over the trust or with an order of a court of competent jurisdiction directing the trustee to transfer to the commissioner with regulatory oversight all of the assets of the trust fund.

(ii) The assets shall be distributed by, and insurance claims shall be filed with and valued by, the commissioner with regulatory oversight in accordance with the laws of the state in which the trust is domiciled that are applicable to the liquidation of domestic insurance companies.

(iii) If the commissioner with regulatory oversight determines that the assets of the trust fund or any part thereof are not necessary to satisfy the claims of the United States ceding insurers of the grantor of the trust, the
 assets or part thereof shall be returned by the commissioner with regulatory oversight to the trustee for distribution in accordance with the trust agreement.

(iv) The grantor hereby waives any right otherwise available to it under United States law that is inconsistent with this provision.

(4) The following requirements apply to the following categories of assuming insurer:

(A) The trust fund for a single assuming insurer shall consist of funds in trust in an amount not less than the assuming insurer’s liabilities attributable to reinsurance ceded by United States domiciled ceding insurers, and, in addition, the assuming insurer shall maintain a trusteed surplus of not less than twenty million dollars ($20,000,000), except as provided in subparagraph (B), (C), or (D).

(B) In the case of a group including incorporated and individual unincorporated underwriters:

(i) For reinsurance ceded under reinsurance agreements with an inception, amendment, or renewal date on or after January 1, 1993, the trust shall consist of a trusteed account in an amount not less than the respective underwriters’ several liabilities attributable to business ceded by United States domiciled ceding insurers to any underwriter of the group.

(ii) For reinsurance ceded under reinsurance agreements with an inception date on or before December 31, 1992, and not amended or renewed after that date, notwithstanding the other provisions of this article, the trust shall consist of a trusteed account in an amount not less than the respective underwriters’ several insurance and reinsurance liabilities attributable to business
 written in the United States.

(iii) In addition to the trusts required in clauses (i) and (ii), the group shall maintain in trust a trusteed surplus of which one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall be held jointly for the benefit of the United States domiciled ceding insurers of any member of the group for all years of account.

(iv) The incorporated members of the group shall not be engaged in any business other than underwriting as a member of the group and shall be subject to the same level of regulation and solvency control by the group’s domiciliary regulator as are the unincorporated members.

(v) The group shall, within 90 days after its financial statements are due to be filed with the group’s domiciliary regulator, provide to the commissioner an annual certification by the group’s domiciliary
 regulator of the solvency of each underwriter member; or, if a certification is unavailable, financial statements prepared by independent public accountants of each underwriter member of the group.

(C) In the case of a group of incorporated insurers under common administration, the group shall meet all of the following requirements:

(i) Have continuously transacted an insurance business outside the United States for at least three years immediately prior to making application for accreditation and be in good standing with its domiciliary regulator.
